Utah statutes.
16-10a-831.   Duties of officers.
Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the
bylaws or, to the extent not inconsistent with the bylaws, the duties
prescribed by the board of directors or by an officer authorized by the board
of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.
